District of Columbia statutes.
8-107.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Cleaning agent” means soaps and detergents used for domestic or commercial cleaning purposes, including the purposes of cleaning fabrics, dishes, eating and cooking utensils, homes, or commercial premises, but the term does not include cosmetics and personal hygiene products like toothpaste, shampoo, and hand soap.

(2)

“Trace quantity of phosphorus” means the portion of a cleaning agent, not more than 0.5% of the weight of the cleaning agent, that constitutes all of the phosphorus in the cleaning agent.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-98, § 2, 33 DCR 723
1981 Ed., § 6-971.